Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.105

Commission speaks for state—Director's oversight.

The commission exists primarily for the benefit of the people of the state of Washington and its economy. The legislature hereby charges the commission, with oversight by the director, to speak on behalf of Washington state government with regard to its particular commodities.

[ 2003 c 396 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.